ro-RO: Zona obiectivului de antrenament: Condiționare; Eschive și schimbări de direcție; Angajament; Portar; Abilități multiple; Pase; Precizia aruncărilor/șuturilor; Mânuirea crosei; Altele
ko: 훈련 중점 분야: 컨디셔닝; 회피 및 컷; 페이스오프; 골키핑; 멀티 스킬; 패스; 슈팅 정확도; 스틱 핸들링; 기타
ja: トレーニング重点分野: コンディショニング; ドッジングとカット; フェイスオフ; ゴールキーピング; マルチスキル; パス; シュートの正確性; スティックハンドリング; その他
en: Training focus area: Conditioning; Dodging and cuts; Face-off; Goalkeeping; Multi-skill; Passing; Shooting accuracy; Stick handling; Other
de: Schwerpunktbereich des Trainings: Konditionstraining; Ausweichen und Cuts; Face-off; Torwarttraining; Multi-Skill; Passspiel; Schussgenauigkeit; Stickhandling; Sonstige
nb: Fokusområde for opplæring: Kondisjon; Unnvikelser og retningsforandringer; Dropp; Keepertrening; Flere ferdigheter; Pasninger; Skuddpresisjon; Kølleteknikk; Annet
tr: Eğitim odak alanı: Kondisyon; Kaçınma ve ani yön değiştirme; Face-off; Kalecilik; Çoklu beceri; Pas verme; Şut isabeti; Sopa hakimiyeti; Diğer
lt-LT: Mokymo dėmesio sritis: Fizinis pasirengimas; Išvengimas ir kirtimai; Išmetimas; Vartininko įgūdžiai; Keli įgūdžiai; Perdavimas; Smūgiavimo taiklumas; Lazdos valdymas; Kita
hu: Képzési fókuszterület: Állóképesség fejlesztése; Cselezés és irányváltás; Bulizás; Kapusmunka; Többféle készség; Passzolás; Lövéspontosság; Ütőkezelés; Egyéb
it: Area di specializzazione dell'allenamento: Condizionamento; Schivate e tagli; Ingaggio (face-off); Allenamento del portiere; Multiskill; Passaggio; Precisione di tiro; Gestione della stecca; Altro
fi: Koulutuksen painopistealue: Fysiikkaharjoittelu; Väistöt ja suunnanmuutokset; Aloitus; Maalivahtipeli; Monitaito; Syöttäminen; Laukaustarkkuus; Mailankäsittely; Muu
ru: Область тренировочной направленности: Физическая подготовка; Финты и уклонения; Вбрасывание; Вратарское мастерство; Несколько навыков; Пасы; Точность бросков; Владение клюшкой; Другое
sl-SI: Področje fokusa treninga: Kondicija; Izmikanje in preigravanje; Sodniški met; Vratarstvo; Več spretnosti; Podajanje; Natančnost strelov; Nadzor nad palico; Drugo
da: Fokusområde for træning: Konditionstræning; Undvigelser og retningsskift; Face-off; Målmandstræning; Flere færdigheder; Aflevering; Skudpræcision; Stavkontrol; Andet
pt-PT: Área de foco do treino: Condicionamento; Esquivas e cortes; Face-off; Defesa da baliza; Multicompetência; Passe; Precisão de remate; Manuseamento do taco; Outro
nl: Trainingsfocusgebied: Conditie; Ontwijken en kappen; Face-off; Keepen; Meerdere vaardigheden; Passen; Schietnauwkeurigheid; Stick-handling; Overig
sk-SK: Oblasť zamerania školenia: Kondícia; Uhýbanie a zmeny smeru; Vhadzovanie; Brankárstvo; Viacero zručností; Prihrávanie; Presnosť streľby; Práca s hokejkou; Iné
vi: Lĩnh vực trọng tâm đào tạo: Tăng cường thể lực; Tránh né và chạy cắt mặt; Tranh bóng; Bắt gôn; Nhiều kỹ năng; Chuyền bóng; Độ chính xác khi ném bóng; Kỹ thuật dùng gậy; Khác
sv: Fokusområde för träning: Kondition; Undanmanövrar och vändningar; Tekning; Målvaktsspel; Multiträning; Passningar; Skottprecision; Klubbteknik; Övrigt
pl: Obszar szkoleniowy: Kondycja; Uniki i zwody; Wznowienia gry (face-off); Bramkarstwo; Wielofunkcyjne; Podawanie; Celność strzałów; Operowanie kijem; Inne
zh-TW: 訓練重點領域: 體能訓練; 閃躲與切入; 爭球; 守門; 綜合技能; 傳球; 射門準確度; 控桿; 其他
th: ขอบเขตการฝึกอบรม: การปรับสภาพร่างกาย; การหลบหลีกและการตัด; การเฟซออฟ; การรักษาประตู; หลายทักษะ; การส่งลูก; ความแม่นยำในการยิง; การควบคุมไม้; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 培训重点领域: 体能训练; 闪躲与变向; 争球; 守门; 多项技能; 传球; 射门/投篮准确度; 运杆; 其他
fr: Compétence travaillée: Conditionnement; Esquives et changements de direction; Mise au jeu; Gardien de but; Compétences multiples; Passes; Précision de tir; Maniement du bâton; Autre
cs: Oblast zaměření tréninku: Kondice; Úhyby a kličky; Vhazování; Brankářský trénink; Více dovedností; Přihrávky; Přesnost střelby; Práce s holí; Jiné
el: Τομέας εστίασης προπόνησης: Φυσική κατάσταση; Αποφυγή και κοψίματα; Face-off; Υπεράσπιση τέρματος; Πολλαπλές δεξιότητες; Πάσα; Ακρίβεια στο σουτ; Χειρισμός στικ; Άλλο
bg-BG: Фокус на обучението: Кондиция; Избягване и финтове; Фейсоф; Вратарски умения; Мултифункционални умения; Подаване; Точност на стрелбата; Работа със стик; Друго
es: Área de enfoque del entrenamiento: Acondicionamiento; Evasión y cortes; Saque neutral; Portería; Multihabilidad; Pases; Precisión de tiro; Manejo del bastón; Otra
hr-HR: Područje fokusa obuke: Kondicija; Izmicanje i nagle promjene smjera; Podbacivanje; Branjenje; Više vještina; Dodavanje; Preciznost pucanja; Rad palicom; Ostalo
pt-BR: Treinamento área de foco: Condicionamento; Esquiva e cortes; Face-off; Defesa de goleiro; Multihabilidades; Passe; Precisão de arremesso; Manuseio do taco; Outro